Utah statutes.
35A-8-1404.   Guidelines for private contributions -- Assuring equitable distribution.

The department shall coordinate with private contributors to home energy assistance programs, such as REACH and Lend-a-Hand, to help assure equitable statewide distribution of assistance to eligible customers of all vendors of energy services.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 212, 2012 General Session

